Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.080

Financing—Permitted inclusions.

The C-PACER financing through a program established under this chapter may include:

(1) The cost of materials and labor necessary for installation or modification of a qualified improvement;

(2) Permit fees;

(3) Inspection fees;

(4) Lender's fees;

(5) Program application and administrative fees;

(6) Project development and engineering fees;

(7) Third-party review fees, including verification review fees;

(8) Capitalized interest;

(9) Interest reserves;

(10) Escrow for prepaid property taxes and insurance; or

(11) Any other fees or costs that may be incurred by the property owner incident to the installation, modification, or improvement on a specific or pro rata basis.

[ 2020 c 27 s 9.]